Washington statutes.
RCW 19.72.130

Release from official's, executor's, licensee's, etc., bond—Effective date—Failure to give new bond, effect.

On and after the date fixed in the notice as the termination date the surety shall be released from subsequent liability on such bond; and, unless before the date fixed in such notice as the termination date by the surety, a new bond shall be filed with sufficient and satisfactory surety as required by law under which the bond was originally furnished and filed, the office, position, or trust in the case of a public office, guardian, executor, administrator, receiver, or trustee shall become vacant and a successor shall be appointed as provided by law; and in case of a license, certificate, permit, or franchise, the same shall become null and void: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no surety shall be released on the bond of any guardian, executor, administrator, receiver, or trustee until such fiduciary shall have furnished a new bond with surety approved by the court, or until his or her successor has been appointed and has qualified and taken over the fiduciary assets. Said notice of withdrawal shall be final and not subject to cancellation by said surety and said license, certificate, permit, or franchise can only be continued upon filing a new bond as above provided.

[ 2011 c 336 s 549; 1937 c 145 s 3; RRS s 9944.] [SLC-RO-17.]